North Carolina, session 2025, SB944.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of six million dollars ($6,000,000) in recurring funds beginning
in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to address root causes of food insecurity by providing
directed grants in equal amounts to the following six nonprofit corporations:
(1) Food Bank of the Albemarle.
(2) Manna Food Bank, Inc.
(3) Action Pathways, Inc.
(4) Food Bank of Central & Eastern North Carolina, Inc.
(5) Second Harvest Food Bank of Northwest North Carolina, Inc.
(6) Second Harvest Food Bank of Metrolina, Inc.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S944-v-1*